Louisiana, session 2026, SB426.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 37:3386.1, 3386.2(A), the introductory paragraph of 3386.2(B), and
3386.2(B)(5) and (6), (F), and (G), 3387.1(A)(2)(b) through (d), 3387.2(A)(2)(b) through
(d), 3387.3(B)(4), 3387.6(E)(1) and (3) and (I), 3388.3, the introductory paragraph of
3390.3(A), 3390.3(A)(11) and (B)(4), and 3390.6(A) and (B)(6) through (8) are hereby
amended and reenacted and R.S. 37:3386.2(B)(7) through (10) and (H), 3387.15, 3387.16,
3388.4, and 3390.6(B)(9) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§3386.1. Definitions
As used in this Chapter, the following terms have the meaning ascribed to
them in this Section:
(1) "Addiction counselor" means any person who is licensed, certified, or
registered in accordance with the provisions of this Chapter and procedures
established by the board and who, by means of his special knowledge acquired
through formal education or practical experience, is qualified to provide addiction
Page 1 of 18
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 426 ENROLLED
counseling services to those individuals afflicted with or suffering from an addictive
disorder or certain co-occurring disorders. The counseling services provided shall be
those which utilize KSA or core functions, as determined by the board to be
appropriate for the addictive disorder or disorders presented.
(2) "Addictive disorder" means the repeated pathological use of substances
including but not limited to alcohol, drugs, or tobacco, or repeated pathological
compulsive behaviors including but not limited to gambling, which cause physical,
psychological, emotional, economic, legal, social, or other harms to the individual
afflicted with the addiction or to others affected by the individual's affliction. As
used in this Chapter, "addictive disorder" shall include not only those instances
where withdrawal from or tolerance to the substance or behaviors are present but
also those instances involving use and abuse of substances.
(3) "Behavioral health condition" means a condition that affects an
individual's emotional, psychological, cognitive, behavioral, or social
functioning and may impact their ability to pursue health, wellness, recovery,
and quality of life, and includes substance use-related conditions, mental health
conditions, co-occurring conditions, trauma-related impacts, and patterns of
behavior that create functional impairment, distress, or increased risk of harm
to the individual or others.
(3)(4) "Board" means the governing body of the Addictive Disorder
Regulatory Authority.
(4)(5) "Certified clinical supervisor" means any person holding the necessary
credential of licensed, certified, or registered addiction counselor or any person who
holds a specialty substance abuse credential in another professional discipline in a
human services field at the master's level or higher; and who has satisfied the
requirements established by the board to provide clinical supervision.
(5)(6) "Client" means the individual, couple, family, group, organization, or
community that seeks or receives addiction counseling services from the addiction
professional or an addiction facility until discharged.
(6)(7) "Clinical supervision" means the interpersonal tutorial relationship
Page 2 of 18
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 426 ENROLLED
between a certified clinical supervisor and other licensed, certified, or registered
addiction counseling professionals centered on the goals of skill development and
professional growth through learning and practicing. Through observation,
evaluation, and feedback, clinical supervision enables the supervisee to acquire the
competence needed to deliver effective patient care while fulfilling professional
responsibility. Clinical supervision is understood to emphasize improvement of the
counseling skills and effectiveness of the supervisee and is to be distinguished from
administrative supervision.
(7)(8) "Compulsive gambling counselor" means any person holding a
necessary credential as a licensed, certified, or registered addiction counselor, or a
necessary credential as a qualified mental health professional, who is certified by the
board, in accordance with the provisions of this Chapter, as possessing special
knowledge acquired through formal education and clinical experience and thus is
qualified to provide gambling addiction counseling to persons who have a gambling
addiction disorder or who exhibit gambling addictive behaviors.
(8)(9) "Co-occurring disorder" means a disorder in which an individual has
at least one psychiatric disorder as well as an addictive disorder. While these
disorders may interact differently in any one person, at least one disorder of each
type can be diagnosed independently of the other.
(9)(10) "Core functions" means the screening, intake, orientation, assessment,
treatment planning, counseling, case management, crisis intervention, client
education, referral, reports, and record-keeping activities associated with counseling
and consultation with other credentialed professionals.
(10)(11) "Counselor-in-training" means any person who has not yet met the
qualification to become a licensed, certified, or registered counselor, but who has
made application to the board in accordance with the provisions of this Chapter and
procedures established by the board.
(12) "Credentialing" means licensing, certification, registration, or
recognition of status of an individual to provide mental health services in
accordance with the provisions of this Chapter.
Page 3 of 18
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 426 ENROLLED
(11)(13) "Custodial environment" means a setting created by a court system
in which a person has been deprived of freedom of action in any significant way.
(12)(14) "KSA" means the knowledge, skills, and attitudes designated by the
board as being necessary for effective addiction counseling and required by the board
to be utilized by addictive disorders counselors in providing addiction counseling
services.
(15) "Licensed mental health professional" means an individual who is
currently licensed and in good standing in the state of Louisiana to practice
within the scope of all applicable state laws, practice acts, and the individual's
professional license, as one of the following:
(a) Medical psychologist.
(b) Licensed psychologist.
(c) Licensed clinical social worker.
(d) Licensed professional counselor.
(e) Licensed marriage and family therapist.
(f) Licensed addiction counselor.
(g) Advanced practice registered nurse.
(h) Licensed rehabilitation counselor.
(16) "Peer support" means nonclinical, strengths-based activities and
services provided by an individual in recovery from a behavioral health
condition to a person experiencing a behavioral health condition. Such services
are grounded in lived experience and include mentoring, guiding, and
supporting individuals in the identification and implementation of recovery
strategies through relationship-based support. Peer support utilizes shared
experience to provide empathy, practical guidance, encouragement, and hope,
and may include assistance with self-advocacy, goal setting, and engagement
with treatment and community-based recovery supports. Peer support services
complement but do not replace clinical treatment and shall not include
diagnosis, clinical assessment, psychotherapy, or any service requiring
professional licensure.
Page 4 of 18
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 426 ENROLLED
(17) "Peer support specialist" means any person who is credentialed in
accordance with the provisions of this Chapter and procedures established by
the board and who, by means of his special knowledge acquired through formal
education and lived experience, is qualified to provide behavioral health
services to those individuals afflicted with or suffering from a behavioral health
condition. The services provided shall be those which utilize support services or
core functions, as determined by the board.
(18) "Peer support specialist supervisor" means any person holding the
necessary credential of peer support specialist, licensed mental health
professional, certified, or registered addiction counselor and who has satisfied
the requirements established by the board to provide peer supervision.
(13)(19) "Prevention" means those activities and services that prevent,
reduce, or stabilize the incidence of addictive disorders and thereby prevent, reduce,
or stabilize the prevalence of addictive disorders. The activities contemplated by this
definition include services to those at risk of developing an addictive disorder as well
as those individuals who, though not necessarily at risk of developing an addictive
disorder, are nonetheless appropriate for services. In addition, prevention shall be
understood to include educational programs and activities that are designed to raise
the awareness of and encourage healthy behaviors.
(14)(20) "Prevention specialist-in-training" means any person who has not
yet met the qualifications to become a licensed, certified, or registered prevention
professional, but who has made application to the board in accordance with the
provisions of this Chapter and procedures established by the board.
(15) "Qualified mental health professional" means:
(a) A psychiatrist licensed pursuant to R.S. 37:1261 et seq.
(b) A psychologist licensed pursuant to R.S. 37:2351 et seq., or a medical
psychologist licensed pursuant to R.S. 37:1360.51 et seq.
(c) A licensed clinical social worker licensed pursuant to R.S. 37:2701 et seq.
(d) A mental health counselor licensed pursuant to R.S. 37:1101 et seq.
(16)(21) "Substance abuse use disorder" means the repeated pathological use
Page 5 of 18
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 426 ENROLLED
of drugs, including alcohol, which causes physical, psychological, economic, legal,
or social harm to the individual user or to others affected by the user's behavior.
§3386.2. Addictive Disorder Regulatory Authority
A. The legislature hereby finds it appropriate that the responsibility and
authority to regulate the practice of addictive disorder treatment, and prevention, and
peer support shall be exercised by a licensing board created for that purpose. It is
the intent of the legislature that a single authority issue and recognize
credentials for addictive disorder counseling, prevention, and peer support
professionals in Louisiana, and that such authority shall be the Addictive
Disorder Regulatory Authority.
B. The Addictive Disorder Regulatory Authority (ADRA) is hereby created
within the Louisiana Department of Health. The ADRA shall be governed by a board
of directors, referred to hereafter in this Chapter as the "board", consisting of eight
eleven voting members, composed of one member appointed by the secretary of
the Louisiana Department of Health to represent the office of behavioral health
and ten members all of whom shall be appointed by the governor, subject to Senate
confirmation, as follows:
* * *
(5) Three members from a list of nine names divided into three groups of
three names each submitted by the Louisiana Association of Substance Abuse
Counselors and Trainers, Inc. One member with a master's degree in addiction
counseling, counseling, psychology, social work, or another human services field
submitted by the president of the University of Louisiana at Lafayette.
(6) One member with a master's degree in addiction counseling,
counseling, psychology, social work, or another human services field submitted
by the president of Louisiana State University.
(7) One member with a master's degree in addiction counseling,
counseling, psychology, social work, or another human services field submitted
by the president of Southern University New Orleans.
(8) One member with a master's degree in addiction counseling,
Page 6 of 18
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 426 ENROLLED
counseling, psychology, social work, or another human services field submitted
by the president of Northwestern State University.
(9) One member who is a trained and recognized peer support specialist
with a minimum of three years of experience as a peer support specialist
providing peer support services to persons with addictive disorders.
(10) One member who is a consumer selected from the state at large.
* * *
F. Except for the consumer member, each member of the board shall at
the time of appointment satisfy all of the following criteria:
(1) Be currently credentialed by the board.
(2) Have no disciplinary history with the board.
(3) Be eligible to provide supervised clinical services, mentor trainees, or
participate in board-approved supervision structures.
(4) Demonstrate competency in all of the following:
(a) Addiction counseling and recovery-oriented care.
(b) Co-occurring disorder treatment.
(c) Evidence-based behavioral health practices.
(5) Have familiarity with Louisiana's behavioral health infrastructure,
including state agencies, parish level services, and community based recovery
networks.
F.G.(1) The consumer member of the board shall possess all of the following
qualifications:
(a) Is a citizen of the United States and has been a resident of Louisiana for
at least one year immediately prior to appointment.
(b) Has attained the age of majority.
(c) Has never been licensed by any of the licensing boards identified in R.S.
36:259(A), nor shall he have a spouse who has ever been licensed by a board
identified in R.S. 36:259(A).
(d) Has never been convicted of a felony.
(e) Does not have and has never had a material financial interest in the
Page 7 of 18
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 426 ENROLLED
healthcare profession.
(2) The consumer member shall be a full voting member of the board with
all rights and privileges conferred on board members, except that the consumer
member shall not participate in the grading of individual examinations.
G.H. It is the intent of the legislature that the board exercise all regulatory
jurisdiction over the credentialing and practice of addiction counselors, peer support
specialists, prevention professionals, persons holding specialty certifications issued
by the board, paraprofessionals authorized by this Chapter, and those in training to
become addiction counselors and prevention professionals.
* * *
§3387.1. Certified addiction counselor; scope of practice
A. * * *
(2) * * *
(b) The certified addiction counselor shall work only under the supervision
of a licensed addiction counselor or qualified licensed mental health professional.
(c) The certified addiction counselor shall register his supervisory licensed
addiction counselor or qualified licensed mental health professional with the board.
(d) Supervisory contact between the certified addiction counselor and the
supervisory licensed addiction counselor or qualified licensed mental health
professional shall be regular and documented, and shall be provided to the board
upon request.
* * *
§3387.2. Registered addiction counselor; scope of practice
A. * * *
(2) * * *
(b) The registered addiction counselor shall work only under the supervision
of a licensed addiction counselor or other qualified licensed mental health
professional.
(c) The registered addiction counselor shall register his supervisory licensed
addiction counselor or other qualified licensed mental health professional with the
Page 8 of 18
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 426 ENROLLED
Addictive Disorder Regulatory Authority.
(d) Supervisory contact between the registered addiction counselor and the
supervisory licensed addiction counselor or qualified licensed mental health
professional shall be regular and documented, and shall be provided to the board.
* * *
§3387.3. Counselor-in-training
* * *
B.(1) * * *
* * *
(4) The counselor-in-training may work only under the direct supervision of
a licensed addiction counselor, certified addiction counselor, or registered addiction
counselor; or in the absence of a licensed, certified, or registered addiction counselor,
under the direction of a qualified licensed mental health professional.
* * *
§3387.6. Certified compulsive gambling counselor
* * *
E. The board shall recognize as a certified compulsive gambling counselor
each candidate who:
(1) Is a licensed, certified, or registered addiction counselor, or who is a
qualified licensed mental health professional.
* * *
(3) Does not have any pending disciplinary action with the board, or, in the
case of a qualified licensed mental health professional, with the appropriate
regulatory board.
* * *
I. The board shall revoke the certification for gambling counseling of any
person who does not maintain the valid and current necessary credential of licensed,
certified, or registered addiction counselor or qualified licensed mental health
professional.
* * *
Page 9 of 18
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 426 ENROLLED
§3387.15. Peer support specialist; scope of practice
A.(1) The practice of peer support within the meaning and intent of this
Chapter shall consist of the supervised rendering of mentorship, guidance, and
support services to individuals suffering from a behavioral health condition to
assist them in gaining an understanding of the nature of their disorder and
developing and maintaining a responsible lifestyle.
(2) A peer support specialist shall not practice autonomously.
Supervision shall be rendered by a licensed mental health professional or peer
support specialist supervisor. A peer support specialist shall not render clinical
services.
(3) The scope of practice, in addition to any other applicable provision
of this Chapter, shall include implementing strategic support, providing
mentorship to family members and, as appropriate, to others affected by the
individual's behavioral health condition.
B. The board shall adopt and promulgate rules which govern peer
support specialists in accordance with the provisions of this Chapter.
C. Any person seeking to be certified by the board as a peer support
specialist shall submit an application on a form and in a manner prescribed by
the board. The initial application form shall be accompanied by an initial
application fee as provided for in this Chapter.
D. Upon investigation of the application, the board shall, within forty-
five days, notify each candidate that the application is satisfactory and accepted
or unsatisfactory and rejected. If an application is rejected, the notice shall state
the reason for such rejection.
E. The board shall recognize, as a peer support specialist, each candidate
who satisfies all of the following criteria:
(1) Is a legal resident of the United States and at least eighteen years of
age on the date the application is received.
(2) Is not in violation of any ethical standards prescribed by the board.
(3) If the applicant has lived experience with a behavioral health
Page 10 of 18
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 426 ENROLLED
condition, has attested to at least twelve months of stability and is not currently
engaged in acute treatment at the time the application is received.
(4) Has not been convicted of, or entered a plea of guilty or a plea of nolo
contendere to, a felony. However, the board may, in its discretion, waive this
requirement upon review of the individual's circumstances. Each candidate
shall sign a form prescribed by the board authorizing the board to obtain a
criminal history or to conduct a criminal background check to be performed by
the Bureau of Criminal Identification and Information. The bureau shall, upon
request and after receipt of fingerprints and other identifying information from
the board, make available to the board information contained in the bureau's
criminal history record and identification files, which pertains to the individual
applying to be licensed by the board as a peer support specialist. In addition, in
order to determine the applicant's suitability for licensing, the bureau shall then
forward the applicant's fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for
a national criminal history check. The results of the criminal history record
check shall not be released to any other individual or agency outside of the
board. The bureau shall charge a processing fee as provided in R.S.
15:587(B)(1).
(5) Signs a form of professional and ethical accountability and
responsibility as prescribed by the board.
(6)(a) Demonstrates professional competence by passing a written
examination.
(b) The board shall determine the scope and administration of the
examination.
(c) The board may provide for circumstances under which a candidate
who fails the examination, but who meets all other requirements, may retake
the examination.
(d) The board shall make reasonable accommodations for those
candidates who demonstrate a special need or disability.
(7) Documents the completion of education specific to the domains of
Page 11 of 18
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 426 ENROLLED
peer support.
(8) Documents the completion of supervision specific to domains of peer
support and core functions under conditions as shall be determined by the
board. The board may require that such supervision be conducted by an
organization's documented and qualified supervisory staff per job description.
F. The board may prescribe such other qualifications and requirements
for peer support specialists as may be appropriate for the protection of the
public or the enhancement of professional services provided pursuant to the
authority of this Chapter.
§3387.16. Peer support specialist supervisor; scope of practice
A. The legislature finds that peer support is an effective and necessary
component in the continuum of behavioral health treatment and services. In
order to better provide for the health and welfare of the citizens of this state, the
legislature desires to enhance the profession of peer support by providing for
a qualified workforce in sufficient numbers to meet the needs of Louisiana and
to contribute to the development of healthy communities within the state. The
legislature finds peer support supervision to be essential for the ongoing
development of a qualified workforce sufficient to meet the present and
anticipated public health needs of the state.
B. The board shall adopt and promulgate rules which govern peer
support specialist supervisors in accordance with the provisions of this Chapter.
C. Any person seeking to be recognized by the board as a peer support
specialist supervisor shall submit an application to the board on a form and in
a manner as the board shall prescribe. The initial application form shall be
accompanied by an initial application fee as provided for in this Chapter.
D. Upon investigation of the application, the board shall, within forty-
five days, notify each candidate that the application is satisfactory and accepted
or unsatisfactory and rejected. If an application is rejected, the notice shall state
the reason for such rejection.
E. The board shall recognize, as a peer support specialist supervisor,
Page 12 of 18
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 426 ENROLLED
each candidate who satisfies all of the following criteria:
(1) Is a legal resident of the United States and at least eighteen years of
age on the date the application is received.
(2) Is not in violation of any ethical standards prescribed by the board.
(3) If the applicant has lived experience with a behavior health condition,
has attested to at least twelve months of stability and is not currently engaged
in acute treatment at the time the application is received.
(4) Has not been convicted of, or entered a plea of guilty or a plea of nolo
contendere to, a felony. However, the board may, in its discretion, waive this
requirement upon review of the individual's circumstances. Each candidate
shall sign a form prescribed by the board authorizing the board to obtain a
criminal history or to conduct a criminal background check to be performed by
the Bureau of Criminal Identification and Information. The bureau shall, upon
request and after receipt of fingerprints and other identifying information from
the board, make available to the board information contained in the bureau's
criminal history record and identification files, which pertains to the individual
applying to be licensed by the board as a peer support specialist. In addition, in
order to determine the applicant's suitability for licensing, the bureau shall then
forward the applicant's fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for
a national criminal history check. The results of the criminal history record
check shall not be released to any other individual or agency outside of the
board. The bureau shall charge a processing fee as provided in R.S.
15:587(B)(1).
(5) Signs a form of professional and ethical accountability and
responsibility as prescribed by the board.
F.(1) Each applicant shall demonstrate professional competence in peer
support supervision by passing a written examination.
(2) The board shall determine the scope and administration of the
examination.
(3) The board may provide for circumstances under which a candidate
Page 13 of 18
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 426 ENROLLED
who fails the examination, but meets all other requirements, may retake the
examination.
(4) The board shall make reasonable accommodations for those
candidates who demonstrate a special need or disability.
G. A peer support specialist supervisor may provide supervision for any
other peer support specialist.
* * *
§3388.3. Applicability Peer support specialist renewal
A. It is the intent of the legislature that there be a single authority issuing
credentials for addictive disorder counseling and prevention professionals in
Louisiana. The authority for issuing and recognizing credentials for professionals
engaged in the providing of counseling and prevention services for those who suffer
from addictive disorders shall be the Addictive Disorder Regulatory Authority. Each
peer support specialist shall renew his certification annually. Each renewal shall
be for a twelve-month period.
B. Within the twelve-month period provided for in Subsection A of this
Section, each peer support specialist shall provide to the board documentation
of successfully completing a minimum of twenty board-approved continuing
educational hours. Such hours shall be directly related to the area of
certification, including six continuing educational hours in ethics.
§3388.4. Peer support specialist supervisor renewal
A. The certification for peer support specialist supervisor shall be
renewed every twenty-four months.
B. Within the twenty-four-month period provided for in Subsection A of
this Section, each peer support supervisor shall provide to the board
documentation of successful completion of a minimum of twenty
board-approved continuing educational hours. Such hours shall be directly
related to the area of certification, including six continuing educational hours
in ethics.
C. The documentation required by Subsection B of this Section shall be
Page 14 of 18
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 426 ENROLLED
provided on a form and in a manner prescribed by the board.
D. The board may prescribe such other requirements for renewal as may
be appropriate for the protection of the public or the enhancement of
professional services as provided under the authority of this Chapter.
* * *
§3390.3. Disciplinary action; administrative fee; causes; hearing; appeal
A. The board shall have the power to deny, revoke, or suspend any credential,
specialty certification, status, or other recognition authorized by this Chapter. In
addition, the board is authorized to impose and collect an administrative fee not to
exceed five hundred dollars per violation or otherwise discipline any person holding
a credential, specialty certification, status, or recognition authorized by this Chapter
who engages in any of the following:
* * *
(11) Has been grossly negligent in practice as a licensed, certified, or
registered professional, professional in training, peer support specialist, or assistant,
as provided for in this Chapter.
* * *
B. The board shall adopt rules and procedures establishing a disciplinary
process which shall, at a minimum, comply with the following:
* * *
(4) If the board finds that public health, safety, and welfare requires
emergency action and incorporates a finding to that effect in its order, a summary
suspension of a license, certificate certification, or registration, or status may be
ordered pending proceedings for disciplinary action. Such proceedings shall be
promptly instituted and determined pursuant to rule.
* * *
§3390.6. Addictive disorders professionals; fees and penalties
A. The board shall, by rule, adopt a schedule of fees and penalties to be
charged relative to the issuance of licenses, registrations, and certifications, and
statuses provided for in this Chapter.
Page 15 of 18
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 426 ENROLLED
B. The board may impose and collect the following fees:
* * *
(6) Each application for a peer support specialist supervisor shall be
accompanied by a fee prescribed by the board. The fee for processing the
application shall be in an amount at least sufficient to cover the cost of
processing the application, but shall not be less than fifty dollars nor more than
three hundred dollars. The fee for administering the written examination shall
be in an amount at least sufficient to cover the cost of administering the written
examination, but shall not be less than one hundred dollars nor more than three
hundred dollars. The renewal fee for a peer support specialist or supervisor
shall not be less than one hundred dollars nor more than three hundred dollars.
(6)(7) The board may require that each application or request for a copy of
any roster maintained pursuant to R.S. 37:3386.3(A)(9) be accompanied by a fee of
not less than one hundred dollars nor more than three hundred dollars.
(7)(8) Each training or educational institute, provider, or institution shall pay
a fee of not less than two hundred nor more than two hundred fifty dollars to the
board in order to be authorized to provide approved education, training, and courses.
Such authorization shall be valid for a period of one year. For those education
providers who elect not to seek annual approval, the board is authorized to impose
and collect a fee of not less than one hundred nor more than one hundred fifty dollars
for each course approved. In addition, all providers submitting course reports shall
pay a fee of not less than one nor more than five dollars per participant.
(8)(9) Any person seeking approval of continuing education credit when
those credits were not approved pursuant to Paragraph (7)(8) of this Subsection, shall
pay a fee of not less than twenty-five dollars nor more than fifty dollars for each
fifteen hours of continuing education credit.
Section 2. R.S. 40:1203.3(E) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1203.3. Refusal to hire or contract; termination of employment; exceptions to
hiring prohibition; appeal procedure; waiver
* * *
Page 16 of 18
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 426 ENROLLED
E.(1) For purposes of this Subsection, "peer support specialist" means a
behavioral health staff member who possesses lived experience with his own
behavioral health condition and with navigating the behavioral health services
network who seeks employment with a behavioral healthcare facility or program
serving people with behavioral health conditions.
(2)(1) The provisions of this Subsection shall apply exclusively to certified
addiction counselors, registered addiction counselors, counselors in training, or
peer support specialists employed or contracted with a behavioral health services
provider licensed by the department and shall not be construed to apply to any other
person or any licensed personnel.
(3)(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person shall not be
prohibited or disqualified from employment as a peer support specialist certified
addiction counselor, registered addiction counselor, counselor in training, or
peer support specialist with a licensed behavioral health services provider if the
person's criminal background check reveals he has been convicted of an offense
provided for in R.S. 14:38.1 or 67, or convicted of distribution or possession with the
intent to distribute controlled dangerous substances listed in Schedules I through V
of the Uniform Controlled Dangerous Substances Law, R.S. 40:961 et seq., if that
person meets all of the following requirements:
(a) No less than three years prior to being hired as a peer support specialist,
the person satisfactorily completed his sentence or was lawfully released from
confinement, supervision, or probation imposed by a court for the person's most
recent conviction for an offense listed in this Paragraph.
(b) After satisfactorily completing his sentence or after being lawfully
released from confinement, supervision, or probation for his most recent conviction
for an offense listed in this Paragraph, the person successfully completed all training
and requirements established by the office of behavioral health of the department for
a peer support specialist as evidenced by a Notice of Completion of Training and
Requirements issued by the office of behavioral health or its designee Addictive
Disorder Regulatory Authority.
Page 17 of 18
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 426 ENROLLED
(4)(3) Nothing in this Subsection shall be construed as creating an obligation
upon an employer to offer employment to a person.
(5)(4) The department Addictive Disorder Regulatory Authority shall
promulgate rules in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act relating to the
training and requirements of peer support specialists for purposes of implementing
this Subsection.
Section 3.(A) The Addictive Disorder Regulatory Authority shall convene an
advisory group, composed of subject matter experts on addictive disorders and peer support
services and peer support specialists, to coordinate with the Louisiana Department of Health
during the transition of peer support specialists from the department to the board.
(B) Any individual recognized by the Louisiana Department of Health as a peer
support specialist on the effective date of this Act shall continue to be recognized by the
Addictive Disorders Regulatory Authority. Upon transfer from the Louisiana Department
of Health to the Addictive Disorders Regulatory Authority, a peer support specialist shall
renew his certification twelve months from the date of his most recent recognition by the
Louisiana Department of Health.
(C) Any rules promulgated by the Addictive Disorder Regulatory Authority relative
to peer support specialists and peer support specialist supervisors shall align with the
Substance Abuse Mental Health Services Administration's (SAMHSA) National Model
Standards for Peer Support Certification in accordance with any federal requirements by the
Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS).
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 18 of 18
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.